Wyoming, session 2026, HB0069.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1.
(a) The department of health, in consultation with
the city of Lander, the board of land commissioners and the
office of state lands and investments, is authorized and
directed to convey its right, title and interest in the
surface estate of the following described parcel of land in
Fremont county, containing twenty-eight and ninety-four
hundredths (28.94) acres, more or less, held for the
Wyoming state training school, to the Wyoming department of
transportation: a parcel of land located in section 17,
township 33 north, range 99 west, sixth principal meridian,
Fremont county, Wyoming, described more particularly as
follows: begin at an iron rod marking the southeasterly
corner of Leda enterprise park, as per plat thereof
recorded in plat book 8, page 193, in the public records of
Fremont county; thence, north 00 degrees, 03 minutes, 48
seconds west (bearing basis), along the easterly boundary
of said subdivision, for a distance of 292.53 feet to an
iron rod; thence, north 70 degrees, 00 minutes, 00 seconds
east, along said easterly boundary, for a distance of
312.19 feet to an iron rod; thence, north 05 degrees, 00
minutes, 00 seconds west, along said easterly boundary, for
a distance of 486.41 feet to the southerly right-of-way
line of Enterprise boulevard; thence, south 78 degrees, 51
minutes, 23 seconds east, along said right-of-way line for
a distance of 184.68 feet to a point, said point being on a
circular curve concave to the north; thence,
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0069
ENROLLED ACT NO. 39, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
counterclockwise to the left, along the arc of said curve,
having a radius of 90.56 feet, for an arc distance of
207.14 feet, chord bearing and chord distance of south 68
degrees, 10 minutes, 24 seconds east, 164.84 feet, to the
end of said curve; thence, north 36 degrees, 19 minutes, 29
seconds east, for a distance of 708.32 feet to the north
line of section 17; thence, north 88 degrees, 58 minutes,
31 seconds east along the north line of said section for a
distance of 26.13 feet; thence, departing said section
line, south 45 degrees, 44 minutes, 42 seconds east, for a
distance of 257.40 feet; thence, north 43 degrees, 46
minutes, 16 seconds east, for a distance of 257.74 feet to
the north line of said section; thence, north 88 degrees,
58 minutes, 31 seconds east, along the section line, for a
distance of 262.94 feet; thence, south 22 degrees, 03
minutes, 52 seconds west, for a distance of 1448.41 feet;
thence, south 88 degrees, 36 minutes, 52 seconds west, for
a distance of 1112.35 feet to the point of beginning.
(b) The conveyance authorized in this section shall
be made without impacting other rights or estates
associated with the parcels or the portions thereof to be
conveyed under this section and subject to easements,
setbacks and restrictions of record.
(c) The conveyance authorized under this section
shall be made without the payment of consideration, except
all costs associated with any necessary survey, title
insurance and closing shall be paid by the department of
transportation for the parcel conveyed in subsection (a) of
this section.
Section 2.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0069
ENROLLED ACT NO. 39, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(a) The department of health, in consultation with
the city of Lander, the board of land commissioners and
the office of state lands and investments, is authorized
and may convey its right, title and interest in the surface
estate of the following described parcel of land in Fremont
county, containing ninety and eighty-seven hundredths
(90.87) acres, more or less, held for the Wyoming state
training school, in accordance with the requirements of
this section: a parcel of land located in the northeast
quarter of section 17, township 33 north, range 99 west,
sixth principle meridian, Fremont county, Wyoming,
described as follows: begin at the northeast corner of
section 17, as marked by an existing stone; thence, south
00 degrees, 38 minutes, 00 seconds east (basis of bearings)
along the east line of said northeast 1/4 for a distance of
1985.07 feet to the southeast corner of the north 1/2 of
the southeast 1/4 of the northeast 1/4; thence, south 88
degrees, 30 minutes, 12 seconds west along the south line
of said north 1/2 of southeast 1/4 of the northeast 1/4 for
a distance of 1321.33 feet to the southwest corner of said
north 1/2 of southeast 1/4 of the northeast 1/4; thence,
south 00 degrees, 21 minutes, 43 seconds west along the
east line of the southwest 1/4 of the northeast 1/4 for a
distance of 665.35 feet to the southeast corner of the
southwest 1/4 of the northeast 1/4; thence, south 88
degrees, 20 minutes, 50 seconds west along the south line
of the southwest 1/4 of the northeast 1/4 for a distance of
922.54 feet to a point 402.0 feet east of the southwest
corner of the southwest 1/4 of the northeast 1/4; thence,
north 00 degrees, 05 minutes, 38 seconds west along the
east line of a parcel of land described in document number
2015-1378525, for a distance of 520.0 feet; thence, south
88 degrees, 20 minutes, 50 seconds west along the north
line of said parcel for a distance of 402.0 feet to the
west line of the southwest 1/4 of the northeast 1/4;
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0069
ENROLLED ACT NO. 39, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
thence, north 00 degrees, 05 minutes, 38 seconds west along
the west line of said southwest 1/4 of northeast 1/4 for a
distance of 818.05 feet to the northwest corner of the
southwest 1/4 of the northeast 1/4; thence, north 89
degrees, 55 minutes, 41 seconds east along the south line
of Leda enterprise park, as per plat thereof recorded in
plat book 8, page 193, in the public records of Fremont
county, for a distance of 90.0 feet to an iron rod; thence,
north 88 degrees, 36 minutes, 52 seconds east for a
distance of 1112.35 feet; thence, north 22 degrees, 03
minutes, 52 seconds east for a distance of 1448.41 feet to
the north line of the northeast 1/4; thence, north 88
degrees, 58 minutes, 31 seconds east, along said line for a
distance of 874.95 feet to the point of beginning.
(b) The conveyance of the parcel specified in
subsection (a) of this section shall be in accordance with
all of the following:
(i) The conveyance shall be completed in
accordance with title 36, chapter 9 of the Wyoming
statutes, except as otherwise provided in this subsection;
(ii) The conveyance authorized in this section
shall be made without impacting other rights or estates
associated with the parcel or the portions thereof to be
conveyed under this section and subject to easements,
setbacks and restrictions of record;
(iii) One (1) or more conveyances may be made to
dispose of the parcel, or portions thereof, identified in
subsection (a) of this section;
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0069
ENROLLED ACT NO. 39, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iv) All costs associated with any necessary
survey, title insurance and closing shall be paid by the
purchaser;
(v) No conveyance shall be made under this
section unless the purchaser of the parcel or any portion
thereof agrees that the sole use of the parcel or any
portion thereof shall be for residential housing. Each
conveyance shall include clauses for the state to claim and
receive liquidated damages if a purchaser violates the
agreement or covenant required under this paragraph.
Section 3. The department of transportation shall
report to the joint transportation, highways and military
affairs interim committee as the land transfers authorized
by sections 1 and 2 of this act are being finalized and
after the land transfers occur.
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0069
ENROLLED ACT NO. 39, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
6